Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1209
Funds; disbursement.

Out of the funds received pursuant to section 2-1208, the expenses of the commissioners, the compensation and reasonable expenses of the executive director, assistants, and employees, and the other reasonable expenses of the commission related to the regulation of horseracing, including suitable furniture, equipment, supplies, and office expenses, shall first be paid. Sums paid out by the commission shall be subject to the general policy for disbursement of funds by agencies of the state, including regular audit.

Laws 1935, c. 173, § 9, p. 633;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-1509;

R.S.1943, § 2-1209;

Laws 1994, LB 1153, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB561, § 13.